Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Article 11. Care of Military Property.

§ 44-103.
Deposit in armories or headquarters for safekeeping.

All arms, equipment and ordnance stores, which shall be furnished to the several commands under the provisions of this chapter, shall be deposited in the armories or headquarters of such commands for safekeeping.

History.

1930, p. 968; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(88).

§ 44-104.
Care required and liability of officers.

All commissioned officers of the Virginia National Guard and Virginia Defense Force shall exercise the strictest care and vigilance for the preservation of the uniforms, arms, supplies, equipment and military property furnished to their several commands under the provisions of this chapter. Any officer receiving public property for military use shall be responsible for the articles so received by him; and he shall not transfer such property, or any portion thereof, to another, either as a loan or permanently, without the authority of the Adjutant General, or his duly authorized representative.

History.

1930, p. 968; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(89); 1958, c. 393; 1984, c. 765; 2011, cc. 572, 586; 2015, c. 221.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and deleted “State” preceding “Defense Force.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 221 substituted “Virginia National Guard and Virginia Defense Force” for “Virginia National Guard, Virginia Defense Force and naval militia.”

§ 44-105.
Repealed by Acts 1958, c. 393.

§ 44-106.
Upon disbandment of organization, or call into active federal service, commanding officer to return certain property to Adjutant General.

Upon the disbandment of any organization, or call into active federal service of such organization, which has received arms, supplies or equipment from the Adjutant General, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the commanding officer of such organization shall be responsible for the safe return to the custody of the Adjutant General of all such public property in possession of the organization, except for such federally owned property that may be required by federal law to be retained by such organization in the federal service.

History.

1930, p. 968; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(91); 1958, c. 393.

§ 44-107.
Use for private purposes forbidden.

No officer or enlisted person shall use, except upon military duty any article of military property belonging to the United States or to the Commonwealth.

History.

1930, p. 969; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(92); 1958, c. 393.

§ 44-108.
Officers and enlisted persons personally liable for military property.

Every officer and enlisted person to whom any article of military property is delivered in pursuance of the provisions of this chapter shall be held personally responsible for its care, safekeeping, and return. He shall use the same for military purposes only, and upon receiving a discharge, or otherwise leaving the military service, or upon demand of his commanding officer or the Adjutant General, shall forthwith surrender and deliver such property in as good order and condition as the same was at the time he received it, reasonable fair wear and tear excepted. As insurance for compliance with the provisions of this chapter, the Adjutant General may require the bonding of any or all such officers or enlisted persons in an amount that he may deem appropriate, commensurate with the responsibilities of such officers or enlisted persons. The cost of such bonds shall be borne from funds appropriated for the operation of the Department of Military Affairs, and shall be without cost to the individual officer and/or enlisted person bonded.

History.

1930, p. 969; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(93); 1958, c. 393.

§ 44-109.
Punishment for injuries to military property.

Whoever shall willfully or maliciously destroy, injure, or deface any arms or articles of military property belonging to the United States or to the Commonwealth, or receive any property in violation of the preceding sections of this chapter, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and be fined not exceeding double the amount of the value of the property so injured or defaced, or, in the discretion of the jury, be imprisoned in jail not less than two weeks nor more than two months.

History.

1930, p. 969; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(94).

§ 44-110.
Punishment for sale, etc., of military property.

Whoever shall secrete, sell, dispose of, offer for sale, or in any manner pawn or pledge, or receive in pawn or pledge, buy, or intentionally fail to return after having been legally discharged from the National Guard any of the arms, uniforms, or equipments, being the property of the United States or of the Commonwealth, knowing or having reason to believe the same to be the property of the United States or the Commonwealth, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall, on conviction thereof, be imprisoned in jail for not less than six months nor more than one year, or in the discretion of the jury or judge, be fined not less than $50 nor more than $1,000.

History.

1930, p. 969; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(95); 2011, cc. 572, 586.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and inserted “or intentionally fail to return after having been legally discharged from the National Guard” and “or judge,” and made a related change, substituted “$1,000” for “$100” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 44-111.
Replacement of lost or damaged property.

Whenever any military property issued to the militia of the Commonwealth shall have been lost, damaged, or destroyed, and upon report of a disinterested survey officer of the armed forces or militia it shall appear that the loss, damage or destruction of property was due to carelessness or neglect, or that its loss, damage or destruction could have been avoided by the exercise of reasonable care, the money value of such property shall be charged against the bond of the officer or enlisted person, if bonded. If such officer or enlisted person is not bonded, the value of such property shall be charged to such officer or enlisted person, and the pay of such officer or enlisted person from both federal and state funds at any time accruing may be stopped and applied to the payment of any such indebtedness until the same is discharged. In addition thereto, any officer accountable or responsible for military property shall be liable on his bond to the Commonwealth and the United States Property and Fiscal Officer as accounting, accountable and responsible officer for any lost, damaged, or destroyed property for which he is accountable or responsible.

History.

1930, p. 969; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(96); 1958, c. 393.